Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 350.600 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly finds that[ there has been a] recent interest in[ the
Commonwealth in the] mining and processing of oil shale in the Commonwealth is
due to the critical need for fossil fuel[ which has developed in this country]. The
General Assembly further finds that the development of this fossil fuel could be of
significant long-range benefit to the Commonwealth and to the United States of
America; however,[ but that] the unregulated extraction and processing of oil shale
within the Commonwealth could cause soil erosion, water pollution, and the
destruction of aesthetic and agricultural values. The General Assembly further finds
that, in order to effectively regulate the extraction and processing of oil shale, the
Energy and Environment Cabinet shall conduct extensive research concerning the
process, waste production, and potentially adverse environmental impacts of such
recovery operations.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for the[ such] regulation and
control of[ the] mining activity and the processing of oil shale[ as] to minimize and
prevent its adverse effects on the citizens and the environment of the
Commonwealth. The General Assembly further finds that the Energy and
Environment Cabinet is the most competent agency to regulate the extraction and
processing of oil shale due to its expertise in the handling of the surface mining of
other minerals and in the regulation of other sources of air and water pollution.
(3) The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall file with the administrative regulations
compiler reasonable rules and administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A pertaining to oil shale mining operations, which shall include strip
mining as defined by KRS 350.010, the surface effects of underground mining of
oil shale, and the in situ mining of oil shale by June 30, 1981. No person shall
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/26/2026 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2336
engage in the commercial mining or processing of oil shale until such time as the
cabinet promulgates rules and administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to provide standards for such mining.
(4) In promulgating administrative regulations pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, the secretary shall make written finding that the administrative regulations
promulgated are based on sound scientific and engineering data and are reasonably
necessary to protect the people and environment of the Commonwealth from the
adverse effects of oil shale extraction. The secretary shall promulgate
administrative regulations consistent with existing standards for land, water, and air
protection. The secretary may conduct a public hearing on the subject of the
cabinet's administrative regulation of the extraction and processing of oil shale for
the purpose of collecting data and receiving public comments on this issue. The
hearing will be held at a time and place to be determined by the secretary in
accordance with the policy of the cabinet.
(5) Prior to the adoption of the administrative regulations required by this section, any
person may conduct core drilling, experimentation, removal of samples, or a pilot
and demonstration project which involves the mining of not more than five (5)
acres for the production of oil shale in any one (1) county. [Such ]Core drilling,
experimentation, removal of samples, or pilot and demonstration project involving
the mining of not more than five (5) acres for the production of oil shale in any one
(1) county shall not be initiated until written notification of the intent to perform
such operations shall be filed at least fifteen (15) days prior to commencement of
such projects by registered mail by the mine operator with the secretary of the
Energy and Environment Cabinet of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and with the
person(s) holding title to the surface of the land to be utilized for the[such]
operations.
(6) The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet of the Commonwealth of
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/26/2026 4:15 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2336
Kentucky shall be granted the right to monitor such core drilling, experimentation,
removal of samples, or pilot and demonstration project as it may deem necessary
for the purpose of establishing sound and reasonable scientific and engineering data
upon which rules and regulations pertaining to oil shale mining operations in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky can be based.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/26/2026 4:15 PM Jacketed